Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB162.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1834YC (1) 91 ll/js H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 331.301, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 27. a. A county shall adopt an ordinance, 3 motion, resolution, or amendment that allows a minimum of one 4 accessory dwelling unit on the same lot as a single family 5 residence in accordance with the following conditions: 6 (1) An accessory dwelling unit shall comply with all 7 applicable building regulations as defined in section 103A.3. 8 (2) An accessory dwelling unit shall be prohibited or 9 limited only to the extent that a state historic building code 10 restriction, as adopted by a county in accordance with section 11 103A.43, subsection 3, a deed restriction, or a rule of a 12 common interest community, as defined in section 499C.1, limits 13 or prohibits the construction or use of an accessory dwelling 14 unit. The imposition of an ordinance, motion, resolution, or 15 amendment regulating accessory dwelling units that is more 16 restrictive when applied to a common interest community than 17 when applied to a single family residence is prohibited. 18 (3) If a manufactured home as defined in section 435.1, 19 subsection 3, or a mobile home as defined in section 435.1, 20 subsection 5, is used as an accessory dwelling unit, the 21 manufactured home or mobile home shall be converted to real 22 property by being placed on a permanent foundation and assessed 23 for real estate taxes pursuant to section 435.26. 24 b. Except as otherwise provided in paragraph âaâ or by state 25 law, a county shall not impose any of the following limitations 26 or restrictions: 27 (1) A requirement that an accessory dwelling unit be smaller 28 than one thousand square feet. However, a county may prohibit 29 the accessory dwelling unit from being larger than the single 30 family residence. 31 (2) Requirements related to the placement or appearance of 32 an accessory dwelling unit that are more restrictive than those 33 imposed on a single family residence including but not limited 34 to the following: maximum building heights; minimum setback 35 -1- LSB 1834YC (1) 91 ll/js 1/ 9 H.F. _____ requirements; minimum lot sizes; minimum building frontages; 1 maximum lot coverages; density requirements; and aesthetic 2 or architectural standards or requirements. Additionally, a 3 county shall not require an accessory dwelling unit to match 4 the exterior design, roof pitch, or finishing materials of the 5 single family residence. 6 (3) Regulations on the use of an accessory dwelling unit as 7 a rental property that are more restrictive than those provided 8 for in subsection 18 of this section and chapter 562A. 9 (4) A requirement that the lot containing a single family 10 residence and an accessory dwelling unit have additional 11 parking beyond that required for a single family residence or 12 payment of a fee in lieu of providing additional parking. 13 (5) Restrictions on the occupancy of either the single 14 family residence or the accessory dwelling unit by any of 15 the following manners: requiring the property owner to be 16 a resident; requiring a familial, marital, or employment 17 relationship to exist between the occupants of the single 18 family residence and the occupants of the accessory dwelling 19 unit; or restricting the occupancy of an accessory dwelling 20 unit based on income or age. 21 (6) The requirement of new or separate utility lines 22 between the accessory dwelling unit and public utility service 23 connections. However, if full utility access that includes 24 a separate metering system for billing purposes cannot be 25 provided to the accessory dwelling unit, then the county can 26 require new or separate utility lines. 27 (7) Prohibition of the construction of an accessory 28 dwelling unit as it relates to the timing of the construction 29 of the single family residence on the same lot. An accessory 30 dwelling unit can be constructed before, during, or after the 31 construction of the single family residence. 32 (8) Imposition of a different county impact fee structure or 33 development standard for an accessory dwelling unit than those 34 used for the single family residence on the same lot. 35 -2- LSB 1834YC (1) 91 ll/js 2/ 9 H.F. _____ (9) The requirement of improvements or repairs to public 1 streets or sidewalks beyond those imposed on the single family 2 residence on the same lot. 3 c. A county shall approve an accessory dwelling unit permit 4 application that meets the requirements set forth in paragraph 5 âaâ and by state law without discretionary review or hearing 6 and consistent with the time frame assigned to the approval 7 of a single family residence. An accessory dwelling unit 8 permit application not approved or denied within thirty days of 9 receipt shall be deemed approved by the county. If the county 10 denies an accessory dwelling unit permit, the reason for denial 11 shall be provided in writing to the applicant and include any 12 remedy necessary to secure approval. 13 d. A county ordinance, motion, resolution, or amendment 14 regulating accessory dwelling units in a manner that conflicts 15 with this subsection is void. Nothing in this subsection 16 prohibits a county from adopting an ordinance, motion, 17 resolution, or amendment that is more permissive than the 18 requirements provided in this subsection. 19 e. For the purposes of this subsection: 20 (1) âAccessory dwelling unitâ means an additional 21 residential dwelling unit located on the same lot as a single 22 family residence that is either attached to or detached from 23 the single family residence. 24 (2) âDetachedâ includes being part of any accessory 25 structure such as a detached garage. 26 (3) âDwelling unitâ means the same as defined in section 27 562A.6, subsection 3. 28 (4) âSingle family residenceâ means the same as defined 29 in section 562A.6, subsection 15, except to the extent that 30 a single family residence may share utility lines with the 31 accessory dwelling unit if full utility access that includes a 32 separate metering system for billing purposes can be provided 33 to the accessory dwelling unit. 34 Sec. 2. Section 364.3, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 35 -3- LSB 1834YC (1) 91 ll/js 3/ 9 H.F. _____ following new subsection: 1 NEW SUBSECTION . 20. a. A city shall adopt an ordinance, 2 motion, resolution, or amendment that allows a minimum of one 3 accessory dwelling unit on the same lot as a single family 4 residence in accordance with the following conditions: 5 (1) An accessory dwelling unit shall comply with all 6 applicable building regulations as defined in section 103A.3. 7 (2) An accessory dwelling unit shall be prohibited or 8 limited only to the extent that a state historic building code 9 restriction, as adopted by a city in accordance with section 10 103A.43, subsection 3, a deed restriction, or a rule of a 11 common interest community, as defined in section 499C.1, limits 12 or prohibits the construction or use of an accessory dwelling 13 unit. The imposition of an ordinance, motion, resolution, or 14 amendment regulating accessory dwelling units that is more 15 restrictive when applied to a common interest community than 16 when applied to a single family residence is prohibited. 17 (3) If a manufactured home as defined in section 435.1, 18 subsection 3, or a mobile home as defined in section 435.1, 19 subsection 5, is used as an accessory dwelling unit, the 20 manufactured home or mobile home shall be converted to real 21 property by being placed on a permanent foundation and assessed 22 for real estate taxes pursuant to section 435.26. 23 b. Except as otherwise provided in paragraph âaâ or by state 24 law, a city shall not impose any of the following limitations 25 or restrictions: 26 (1) A requirement that an accessory dwelling unit be smaller 27 than one thousand square feet. However, a city may prohibit 28 the accessory dwelling unit from being larger than the single 29 family residence. 30 (2) Requirements related to the placement or appearance of 31 an accessory dwelling unit that are more restrictive than those 32 imposed on a single family residence including but not limited 33 to the following: maximum building heights; minimum setback 34 requirements; minimum lot sizes; minimum building frontages; 35 -4- LSB 1834YC (1) 91 ll/js 4/ 9 H.F. _____ maximum lot coverages; density requirements; and aesthetic 1 or architectural standards or requirements. Additionally, a 2 city shall not require an accessory dwelling unit to match the 3 exterior design, roof pitch, or finishing materials of the 4 single family residence. 5 (3) Regulations on the use of an accessory dwelling unit as 6 a rental property that are more restrictive than those provided 7 for in subsections 9 and 16 of this section, section 414.1, 8 subsection 1, paragraph âeâ , and chapter 562A. 9 (4) A requirement that the lot containing a single family 10 residence and an accessory dwelling unit have additional 11 parking beyond that required for a single-family residence or 12 payment of a fee in lieu of providing additional parking. 13 (5) Restrictions on the occupancy of either the single 14 family residence or the accessory dwelling unit by any of 15 the following manners: requiring the property owner to be 16 a resident; requiring a familial, marital, or employment 17 relationship to exist between the occupants of the single 18 family residence and the occupants of the accessory dwelling 19 unit; or restricting the occupancy of an accessory dwelling 20 unit based on income or age. 21 (6) A requirement of new or separate utility lines between 22 the accessory dwelling unit and public utility service 23 connections. However, if full utility access that includes 24 a separate metering system for billing purposes cannot be 25 provided to the accessory dwelling unit, then the city can 26 require new or separate utility lines. 27 (7) Prohibition of the construction of an accessory 28 dwelling unit as it relates to the timing of the construction 29 of the single family residence on the same lot. An accessory 30 dwelling unit can be constructed before, during, or after the 31 construction of the single family residence. 32 (8) Imposition of a different city impact fee structure or 33 development standard for an accessory dwelling unit than those 34 used for the single family residence on the same lot. 35 -5- LSB 1834YC (1) 91 ll/js 5/ 9 H.F. _____ (9) The requirement of improvements or repairs to public 1 streets or sidewalks beyond those imposed on the single family 2 residence on the same lot. 3 c. A city shall approve an accessory dwelling unit permit 4 application that meets the requirements set forth in paragraph 5 âaâ and by state law without discretionary review or hearing 6 and consistent with the time frame assigned to the approval 7 of a single family residence. An accessory dwelling unit 8 permit application not approved or denied within thirty days 9 of receipt shall be deemed approved by the city. If the city 10 denies an accessory dwelling unit permit, the reason for denial 11 shall be provided in writing to the applicant and include any 12 remedy necessary to secure approval. 13 d. A city ordinance, motion, resolution, or amendment 14 regulating accessory dwelling units in a manner that conflicts 15 with this subsection is void. Nothing in this subsection 16 prohibits a city from adopting an ordinance, motion, 17 resolution, or amendment that is more permissive than the 18 requirements provided in this subsection. 19 e. For the purposes of this subsection: 20 (1) âAccessory dwelling unitâ means an additional 21 residential dwelling unit located on the same lot as a single 22 family residence that is either attached to or detached from 23 the single family residence. 24 (2) âDetachedâ includes being part of an accessory structure 25 such as a detached garage. 26 (3) âDwelling unitâ means the same as defined in section 27 562A.6, subsection 3. 28 (4) âSingle family residenceâ means the same as defined 29 in section 562A.6, subsection 15, except to the extent that 30 a single family residence may share utility lines with the 31 accessory dwelling unit if full utility access that includes a 32 separate metering system for billing purposes can be provided 33 to the accessory dwelling unit. 34 EXPLANATION 35 -6- LSB 1834YC (1) 91 ll/js 6/ 9 H.F. _____ The inclusion of this explanation does not constitute agreement with 1 the explanationâs substance by the members of the general assembly. 2 This bill provides that a county or city shall adopt an 3 ordinance, motion, resolution, or amendment that allows a 4 minimum of one accessory dwelling unit (ADU) on the same 5 lot as a single family residence. The ADU shall comply 6 with all applicable building regulations as defined in Code 7 section 103A.3, and shall be prohibited or limited to the 8 extent that a state historic building code restriction, as 9 adopted by a county or city in accordance with Code section 10 103A.43, subsection 3, a deed restriction, or a rule of a 11 common interest community, as defined in Code section 499C.1, 12 limits or prohibits the construction or use of an ADU. The 13 imposition of an ordinance, motion, resolution, or amendment 14 regulating ADUs that is more restrictive when applied to a 15 common interest community than when applied to a single family 16 residence is prohibited. If a manufactured home as defined in 17 Code section 435.1, subsection 3, or a mobile home as defined 18 in Code section 435.1, subsection 5, is used as an ADU, the 19 manufactured home or mobile home shall be converted to real 20 property by being placed on a permanent foundation and assessed 21 for real estate taxes pursuant to Code section 435.26. 22 A county or city shall not impose any of the following 23 limitations or restrictions: a requirement that an ADU be 24 smaller than 1,000 square feet; requirements related to the 25 placement or appearance of an ADU that are more restrictive 26 than those imposed on a single family residence including 27 maximum building heights, minimum setback requirements, minimum 28 lot sizes, minimum building frontages, maximum lot coverages, 29 density requirements, and aesthetic or architectural standards 30 or requirements; regulations on the use of an ADU as a rental 31 property that are more restrictive than those provided for 32 in Code section 331.301, subsection 18, for counties, Code 33 section 364.3, subsections 9 and 16, and Code section 414.1, 34 subsection 1, paragraph âeâ, for cities; and Code chapter 35 -7- LSB 1834YC (1) 91 ll/js 7/ 9 H.F. _____ 562A; a requirement that the lot containing a single family 1 residence and an ADU have additional parking beyond that 2 required for a single family residence or payment of a fee in 3 lieu of providing additional parking; the requirement of new or 4 separate utility lines between the ADU and public or private 5 utility service connections; prohibition of the construction 6 of an ADU as it relates to the timing of the construction of 7 the single family residence on the same lot; imposition of 8 a different county or city impact fee structure for an ADU 9 than the one used for the single family residence on the same 10 lot; and the requirement of improvements or repairs to public 11 streets or sidewalks beyond those imposed on the single family 12 residence on the same lot. 13 A county or city cannot impose restrictions on the occupants 14 of either the single family residence or the ADU by any 15 the following manners: requiring the property owner to be 16 a resident; requiring a familial, marital, or employment 17 relationship to exist between the occupants of the single 18 family residence and the occupants of the ADU; and restricting 19 the occupancy of an ADU based on income or age. A county or 20 city shall not require an ADU to match the exterior design, 21 roof pitch, or finishing materials of the single family 22 residence. A county or city may prohibit the ADU from being 23 larger than the single family residence on the same lot. If 24 full utility access that includes a separate metering system 25 for billing purposes cannot be provided to the ADU then the 26 county or city can require new or separate utility lines 27 between the ADU and public utility service connections. 28 A county or city must approve an ADU permit application 29 that meets the necessary requirements without discretionary 30 review or hearing and consistent with the time frame assigned 31 to the approval of a single family residence. An ADU permit 32 application not approved or denied within 30 days of receipt 33 shall be deemed approved by the county or city. If the county 34 or city denies an ADU permit, the reason for denial must be 35 -8- LSB 1834YC (1) 91 ll/js 8/ 9 H.F. _____ provided in writing to the applicant and include any remedy 1 necessary to secure approval. A county or city ordinance, 2 motion, resolution, or amendment regulating ADUs in a manner 3 that conflicts with the bill is void. A county or city can 4 adopt an ordinance, motion, resolution, or amendment that is 5 more permissive than the requirements provided in the bill. 6 For the purposes of the bill, âaccessory dwelling unitâ 7 means an additional residential dwelling unit located on the 8 same lot as a single family residence that is either attached 9 to or detached from the single family residence; âdetachedâ 10 includes being part of any accessory structure such as a 11 detached garage; âdwelling unitâ means a structure or the 12 part of a structure that is used as a home, residence, or 13 sleeping place; and âsingle family residenceâ means a structure 14 maintained and used as a single dwelling unit, even if the 15 structure shares utility lines with the ADU if full utility 16 access that includes a separate metering system for billing 17 purposes is provided to the ADU. 18 -9- LSB 1834YC (1) 91 ll/js 9/ 9